Virginia statutes. Title 3.2. Agriculture, Animal Care, and Food.
Chapter 25. Dark-Fired Tobacco Board.

§§ 3.2-2500 through 3.2-2510.

Repealed by Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 28.

Cross references.

For current provisions pertaining to the Dark-Fired Tobacco Promotion Fund, see §

3.2-2407.1

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 29 provides: “That as of July 1, 2012, the Tobacco Board established pursuant to the 27th enactment of this act shall be deemed successor in interest to the Dark-Fired Tobacco Board and the Bright Flue-Cured Tobacco Board. All right, title, and interest in and to any real or tangible personal property vested in, any debts or liabilities owed to the Dark-Fired Tobacco Board and the Bright Flue-Cured Tobacco Board, and any enforcement actions taken on behalf of the Dark-Fired Tobacco Board and the Bright Flue-Cured Tobacco Board as of July 1, 2012, shall be transferred to and taken as standing in the name of the Tobacco Board.”

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 30 provides: “That the gubernatorial appointees to the Dark-Fired Tobacco Board and the Bright Flue-Cured Tobacco Board holding office on July 1, 2012, shall continue to serve on the Tobacco Board established pursuant to the 27th enactment of this act until such time as the existing terms might expire or become renewed. However, any new appointments made after July 1, 2012, shall be made in accordance with the provisions of this act.”

Former §

3.2-2500

, pertaining to definitions, derived from Code 1950, § 3-239.1; 1964, c. 306; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-308; 1985, c. 448; 2008, c. 860. Former § 3.2-2501, pertaining to the Dark-Fired Tobacco Board; composition and appointment of members, derived from Code 1950, § 3-239.2; 1964, c. 306; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-309; 1978, c. 540; 1985, c. 448; 2008, c. 860; 2011, cc. 691, 714. Former § 3.2-2502, pertaining to Dark-Fired Tobacco Board membership terms, derived from Code 1950, § 3-239.2; 1964, c. 306; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-309; 1978, c. 540; 1985, c. 448; 2008, c. 860. Former § 3.2-2503, pertaining to Dark-Fired Tobacco Board officers and compensation, derived from Code 1950, § 3-239.2; 1964, c. 306; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-309; 1978, c. 540; 1985, c. 448; 2008, c. 860. Former
§ 3.2-2504, pertaining to the powers and duties of Dark-Fired Tobacco Board, derived from Code 1950, §§ 3-239.2, 3-239.3; 1964, c. 306; 1966, c. 702, §§ 3.1-309, 3.1-310; 1978, c. 540; 1985, c. 448; 2008, c. 860. Former § 3.2-2505, pertaining to levy of excise tax, derived from Code 1950, § 3-239.4; 1964, c. 306; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-311; 1973, c. 261; 1992, c. 375; 2008, c. 860. Former
§ 3.2-2506, establishing the Virginia Dark-Fired Tobacco Promotion Fund, derived from Code 1950, §§ 3-239.8, 3-239.9; 1964, c. 306; 1966, c. 702, §§ 3.1-315, 3.1-316; 1978, c. 540; 2008, c. 860. Former § 3.2-2507, pertaining to collection and disposition of tax; reports, derived from Code 1950, § 3-239.5; 1964, c. 306; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-312; 2008, c. 860. Former § 3.2-2508, pertaining to records to be kept by warehouse and handler, derived from Code 1950, § 3-239.6; 1964, c. 306; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-313; 2008, c. 860. Former § 3.2-2509, pertaining to collection of unpaid excise tax and interest thereon, derived from Code 1950, § 3-239.7; 1964, c. 306; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-314; 2008, c. 860. Former § 3.2-2510, making a violation of the chapter a misdemeanor, derived from Code 1950, § 3-239.10; 1964, c. 306; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-317; 2008, c. 860.